Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 8 Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact

20-8-1.
Entry into compact authorized — Text.

The governor of this state is hereby authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of the state of Rhode Island with any one or more of the states of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia, and Florida and with such other states as may enter into the compact, legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-1

.

ATLANTIC STATES MARINE FISHERIES
COMPACT

The contracting states solemnly agree:

ARTICLE I

The purpose of this compact is to promote the better utilization of the fisheries, marine, shell and anadromous, of the Atlantic seaboard by the development of a joint program for the promotion and protection of such fisheries, and by the prevention of the physical waste of the fisheries from any cause. It is not the purpose of this compact to authorize the states joining herein to limit the production of fish or fish products for the purpose of establishing or fixing the price thereof, or creating and perpetuating monopoly.

ARTICLE II

This agreement shall become operative immediately as to those states executing it whenever any two or more of the states of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Rhode Island, Connecticut, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia and Florida have executed it in the form that is in accordance with the laws of the executing state and the Congress has given its consent. Any state contiguous with any of the aforementioned states and riparian upon waters frequented by anadromous fish, flowing into waters under the jurisdiction of any of the aforementioned states, may become a party hereto as hereinafter provided.

ARTICLE III

Each state joining herein shall appoint three (3) representatives to a commission hereby constituted and designated as the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission. One shall be the executive officer of the administrative agency of such state charged with the conservation of the fisheries resources to which this compact pertains or, if there be more than one (1) officer or agency, the official of that state named by the governor thereof. The second shall be a member of the legislature of such state designated by the commission or committee on interstate co-operation of such state, or if there be none, or if said commission on interstate co-operation cannot constitutionally designate the said member, such legislator shall be designated by the governor thereof; provided, that if it is constitutionally impossible to appoint a legislator as a commissioner from such state, the second member shall be appointed by the governor of such state in his or her discretion. The third shall be a citizen who shall have a knowledge of and interest in the marine fisheries problem to be appointed by the governor. This commission shall be a body corporate with the powers and duties set forth herein.

ARTICLE IV

The duty of the said commission shall be to make inquiry and ascertain from time to time such methods, practices, circumstances and conditions as may be disclosed for bringing about the conservation and the prevention of the depletion and physical waste of the fisheries, marine, shell and anadromous, of the Atlantic seaboard. The commission shall have power to recommend the co-ordination of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their respective jurisdictions to promote the preservation of those fisheries and their protection against overfishing, waste, depletion or any abuse whatsoever and to assure a continuing yield from the fisheries resources of the aforementioned states.

To that end the commission shall draft and, after consultation with the advisory committee hereinafter authorized, recommend to the governors and legislatures of the various signatory states legislation dealing with the conservation of the marine, shell and anadromous fisheries of the Atlantic seaboard. The commission shall, more than one (1) month prior to any regular meeting of the legislature in any signatory state, present to the governor of the state its recommendations relating to enactments to be made by the legislature of that state in furthering the intents and purposes of this compact.

The commission shall consult with and advise the pertinent administrative agencies in the states party hereto with regard to problems connected with the fisheries and recommend the adoption of such regulations as it deems advisable.

The commission shall have power to recommend to the states party hereto the stocking of the waters of such states with fish and fish eggs or joint stocking by some or all of the states party hereto and when two or more of the states shall jointly stock waters the commission shall act as the co-ordinating agency for such stocking.

ARTICLE V

The commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice chairman and shall appoint and at its pleasure remove or discharge such officers and employees as may be required to carry the provisions of this compact into effect and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation. Said commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business. It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time or place but must meet at least once a year.

ARTICLE VI

No action shall be taken by the commission in regard to its general affairs except by the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states present at any meeting. No recommendation shall be made by the commission in regard to any species of fish except by the affirmative vote of a majority of the compacting states which have an interest in such species. The commission shall define what shall be an interest.

ARTICLE VII

The fish and wildlife service of the department of the interior of the government of the United States shall act as the primary research agency of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission co-operating with the research agencies in each state for that purpose. Representatives of the said fish and wildlife service shall attend the meetings of the commission.

An advisory committee to be representative of the commercial fishers and the salt-water anglers and such other interests of each state as the commission deems advisable shall be established by the commission as soon as practicable for the purpose of advising the commission upon such recommendations as it may desire to make.

ARTICLE VIII

When any state other than those named specifically in article II of this compact shall become a party thereto for the purpose of conserving its anadromous fish in accordance with the provisions of article II the participation of such state in the action of the commission shall be limited to such species of anadromous fish.

ARTICLE IX

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the powers of any signatory state or to repeal or prevent the enactment of any legislation or the enforcement of any requirement by any signatory state imposing additional conditions and restrictions to conserve its fisheries.

ARTICLE X

Continued absence of representation or of any representative on the commission from any state party hereto shall be brought to the attention of the governor thereof.

ARTICLE XI

The states party hereto agree to make annual appropriations to the support of the commission in proportion to the primary market value of the products of their fisheries, exclusive of cod and haddock, as recorded in the most recent published reports of the fish and wildlife service of the United States department of the interior, provided, no state shall contribute less than two hundred dollars ($200) per annum and the annual contribution of each state above the minimum shall be figured to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100).

The compacting states agree to appropriate initially the annual amounts scheduled below, which amounts are calculated in the manner set forth herein, on the basis of the catch record of 1938. Subsequent budgets shall be recommended by a majority of the commission and the cost thereof allocated equitably among the states in accordance with their respective interests and submitted to the compacting states.

Schedule of Initial Annual State Contributions.

Maine $ 700 New Hampshire 200 Massachusetts 2300 Rhode Island 300 Connecticut 400 New York 1300 New Jersey 800 Delaware 200 Maryland 700 Virginia 1300 North Carolina 600 South Carolina 200 Georgia 200 Florida 1500

Click to view

ARTICLE XII

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each compacting state until renounced by it. Renunciation of this compact must be preceded by sending six (6) months’ notice in writing of intention to withdraw from the compact to the other states party hereto.

20-8-2.
Amendment of compact.

The state of Rhode Island hereby enters into an amendment of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact, §

20-8-1

, with any one or more of the states of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut, New York, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, South Carolina, Georgia, and Florida or such other states as may become party to that compact for the purpose of permitting the states that ratify this amendment to establish joint regulation of specific fisheries common to those states through the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission and their representatives on that body. Notice of intention to withdraw from this amendment shall be executed and transmitted by the governor and shall be in accordance with article XII of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact, §

20-8-1

, and shall be effective as to this state with those states which similarly ratify this amendment. This amendment shall take effect as to this state with respect to any other of the above-mentioned states as to take similar action.

AMENDMENT NO. 1 OF THE ATLANTIC STATES MARINE
FISHERIES COMPACT

The states consenting to this amendment agree that any two or more of them may designate the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission as a joint regulatory agency with such powers as they may jointly confer from time to time for the regulation of the fishing operations of the citizens and vessels of such designating states with respect to specific fisheries in which such states have a common interest. The representatives of such states on the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission shall constitute a separate section of such commission for the exercise of the additional powers so granted provided that the states so acting shall appropriate additional funds for this purpose. The creation of such section as a joint regulatory agency shall not deprive the states participating therein of any of their privileges or powers or responsibilities in the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission under the general compact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2360, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-2

.

20-8-3.
Rhode Island representatives on interstate commission — Ex officio members.

In pursuance of article III of the compact, §

20-8-1

, there shall be three (3) members, hereinafter called “commissioners”, of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission, “the commission”, from the state of Rhode Island. The first commissioner shall be the director of environmental management, ex officio, and the term of that ex officio commissioner shall terminate when he or she ceases to hold the office of director of environmental management. That person’s successor as commissioner shall be his or her successor as director of environmental management. The second commissioner shall be a legislator and who may be a member of the commission on interstate cooperation, ex officio, designated by vote of the commission on interstate cooperation, and the term of that ex officio commissioner shall be for three (3) years and terminate when he or she ceases to hold legislative office or office as a commissioner on interstate co-operation, and his or her successor as commissioner shall be named in like manner. In the event that the commission on interstate cooperation shall have failed to have met and designated a commissioner, the position of commissioner shall alternate every three (3) years between a member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker, and a member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, to a term of three (3) years which shall commence on July 1, and no commissioner appointed by the speaker or the senate president shall serve more than three (3) successive years. The appointments provided for herein shall commence on July 1, 2004, and the first appointment shall be made by the speaker of the house of representatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-3

; P.L. 2004, ch. 359, § 3.

20-8-4.
Appointive commissioner.

The governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a citizen as a third commissioner who shall have a knowledge of, and interest in, the marine fisheries problem. The term of that commissioner shall be three (3) years and he or she shall hold office until his or her successor shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring in the office of that commissioner from any reason or cause shall be filled by appointment by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, for the unexpired term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-4

.

20-8-5.
Delegation of powers by director of environmental management.

The director of environmental management, as ex officio commissioner, may delegate, from time to time, to any deputy or other subordinate in his or her department or office, the power to be present and participate, including voting as his or her representative or substitute, at any meeting of, or hearing by, or other proceeding of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-5

.

20-8-6.
Removal of commissioner.

Any commissioner may be removed from office by the governor upon charges and after a hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-6

.

20-8-7.
Powers of commission — Co-operation and information furnished by state agencies.

There is hereby granted to the commission and the commissioners all the powers provided for in the compact, §

20-8-1

, and all the powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. All officers of the state of Rhode Island are hereby authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular; it being hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Rhode Island to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish its purposes. All officers, bureaus, departments, and persons of, and in, the state government or administration of the state of Rhode Island are authorized and directed at convenient times, and upon request of the commission, to furnish the commission with information and data possessed by them or any of them and to aid the commission by a loan of personnel or other means lying within their legal rights respectively.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-7

.

20-8-8.
Powers granted supplemental.

Any powers granted in this chapter to the commission shall be regarded as in aid of, and supplemental to, and in no case a limitation upon, any of the powers vested in the commission by other laws of the state of Rhode Island or by the laws of the states of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia, and Florida or by the Congress or the terms of the compact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-8

.

20-8-9.
Accounts and reports — Legislative recommendations.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements and shall report to the governor and the legislature of the state of Rhode Island on or before the tenth day of December in each year, setting forth in detail the transactions conducted by it during the twelve (12) months preceding December 1st of that year, and shall make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by it advisable, including amendments to the statutes of the state of Rhode Island that may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of the compact between the signatory states, §

20-8-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-9

.

20-8-10.
Audit of commission’s books.

The controller of the state of Rhode Island is authorized and empowered from time to time to examine the accounts and books of the commission, including its receipts and disbursements, and any other items referring to its financial standing as the controller may deem proper, and to report the results of that examination to the governor of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-10

.

20-8-11.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and the controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much of that sum as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the chairperson of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-11

.

20-8-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1021, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

20-8-12

.